Hawaii statutes.
§157-31 Petition to establish, revise, or
terminate minimum prices, salvage values, and quotas. (a) Upon petition
by the producers and producer-distributors who produce fifty-five per cent of
the milk in a milk shed, or by fifty-five per cent of all producers in a milk
shed, or upon the board's own motion, the board shall adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 to:

(1) Establish, revise, or terminate the minimum
prices or salvage values for milk to be paid to producers and
producer-distributors or the quotas for the production of milk in a milk shed,
or any of them; or

(2) Establish specific formulas or criteria for
determining the minimum prices or salvage values for milk to be paid to
producers and producer-distributors or the quotas for the production of milk in
a milk shed, or any of them.

For the purposes of this section, each
producer-member of an agricultural cooperative shall be counted as a producer,
and an agricultural cooperative shall not be counted as a producer or as a
producer-distributor.

(b) Public hearings to establish, revise, or
terminate minimum prices, salvage values, and quotas or to establish specific
formulas or criteria for setting minimum prices, salvage values, or quotas,
shall not constitute a contested case as defined by chapter 91. [L 1967, c 260,
§20; HRS §157-31; am L 1971, c 184, pt of §4; ree L 1972, c 40, pt of §2; am L
1977, c 96, §2; am L 1997, c 118, §§2, 6; am L 1998, c 19, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next